Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Procedure for Administration

§ 2-4-201.
Persons entitled to administer.

Administration of the estate of a person dying intestate shall be granted to one (1) or more of the persons mentioned in this section. The relatives of the deceased are entitled to administer only when they are entitled to succeed to his personal estate or some portion thereof. They are entitled to administer in the following order:

The surviving husband or wife, or some competent person whom he or she may request to have appointed;

The children;

The father or mother;

The brothers or sisters;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2.

The grandchildren;

The next of kin entitled to share in the distribution of the estate;

The creditors;

Any person legally competent.

If the decedent was a member of a partnership at the time of his death, the surviving partner shall not be appointed administrator of the estate if he is competent only by reason of paragraphs (a)(viii) and (ix) of this section.

No nonresident of the state of Wyoming shall be appointed as administrator unless a resident of Wyoming is appointed as coadministrator.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4635; C.S. 1910, § 5502; C.S. 1920, § 6775; R.S. 1931, § 88-1701; C.S. 1945, § 6-901; W.S. 1957, § 2-93; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-201; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 43, § 1; 1987, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to power of banks and trust companies to act as administrator or executor, see §§

13-2-101

and

13-5-101

.

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

Only relatives succeeding to property entitled to administer. —

The relatives of a decedent are entitled to administer only when they are entitled to succeed to some portion of the decedent's property. In re Estate of Johnson, 379 P.2d 824,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1963).

And nominal bequest equivalent to disinheritance. —

A bequest of a nominal sum, often a dollar but sometimes more to a child or descendent of a testator, is, for all practical purposes, equivalent to complete disinheritance and is treated by the courts as such. In re Estate of Johnson, 379 P.2d 824,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1963).

Possibility of inheritance on lapse of devise not sufficient. —

Relative of decedent not named as executor and expressly excluded from receiving anything under will is not entitled to appointment as administrator with will annexed on mere possibility that devises might lapse and enable him to receive portion as heir. Replogle v. Coolidge, 47 Wyo. 488, 41 P.2d 503,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1935).

Right under section may only be exercised by petition. —

Under §

2-4-205

the right to administration given children of deceased by this section can be exercised only by filing of petition. 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

.

Under this section and §§

2-4-202

,

2-4-205

,

2-4-206

and

2-4-207

, where two children filed petitions, one filing opposition to that of the other, whose appointment the remaining children joined in requesting, the court, having found both competent, could only appoint one or the other, or both of the two petitioning, and appointment of one of the others was erroneous. 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

.

Joining in petition of another waives right. —

Under this section and §§

2-4-202

and

2-4-205

, when two of four children joined in asking appointment of one of the others, they thereby waived their own rights. 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

.

Appointment of Personal Representative. —

Appointment of a personal representative for probate proceedings was separate and distinct from the appointment of a personal representative for purposes of pursuing a wrongful death action. While it was proper for the probate court to appoint a personal representative for handling matters associated with the decedent's estate, the appointment of a personal representative to pursue a wrongful death claim was to be made by the district court within that wrongful death action.
Johnson v. Johnson (In re Estate of Johnson), 2010 WY 63, 231 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

In re Borton's Estate, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

Stated

in

Peters v. Peters, 2001 WY 71, 29 P.3d 90,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Creditor of estate as having adverse interest or position disqualifying him for appointment as personal representative, 18 ALR2d 633.

Effect of divorce, separation, desertion, unfaithfulness, and the like, upon right to administer upon estate of spouse, 34 ALR2d 876.

Separation agreements as barring right of husband or wife to administer deceased spouse's estate, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

What constitutes “estate” of nonresident decedent within statute providing for local ancillary administration where decedent dies leaving estate in jurisdiction, 34 ALR2d 1270.

Potential liability of indemnity or liability insurer or other person to the estate, dependent upon establishment of claim against estate, as justifying grant of administration, 67 ALR2d 936.

Physical condition as affecting competency to act as executor or administrator, 47 ALR3d 1078.

§ 2-4-202.
Appointment of administrator(s).

Where there are several persons equally entitled to administer, the court, or commissioner in vacation may grant letters to one (1) or more of them. When a creditor is claiming letters, the court, or commissioner in vacation, may at the request of another creditor grant letters to any other person legally competent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4636; C.S. 1910, § 5503; C.S. 1920, § 6776; R.S. 1931, § 88-1702; C.S. 1945, § 6-902; W.S. 1957, § 2-94; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-202; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

Cited

in

In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adverse interest or position as disqualification for appointment of administrator, executor, or other personal representative, 11 ALR4th 638.

§ 2-4-203.
Persons incompetent to administer.

No person is competent or entitled to serve as administrator, who is:

Under the age of majority;

Not a bona fide resident of the state unless a resident of Wyoming is appointed coadministrator; or

Adjudged by the court or commissioner incompetent to execute the duties of the trust.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4637; C.S. 1910, § 5504; C.S. 1920, § 6777; R.S. 1931, § 88-1703; C.S. 1945, § 6-903; W.S. 1957, § 2-95; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-203; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iii), substituted "the court or commissioner incompetent to execute" for "the court, or commissioner in vacation, incompetent to execute."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Administrator must be resident. —

The qualifications of an administrator are the same as those of an executor, with one exception. The administrator must be a bona fide resident of the state. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Only listed grounds make person incompetent. —

A person is not incompetent to serve as administrator with the will annexed unless he comes within one or more of the grounds of incompetency specified in this section. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Adverse claim made by person would not render him incompetent

to be an administrator with the will annexed. The bond of the administrator with the will annexed affords ample protection to devisees, legatees and others interested in the estate. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Clerk of district court is not disqualified for appointment

as an administrator. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

Hecht v. Carey, 13 Wyo. 154, 78 P. 705,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1904).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of surviving spouse, personally incompetent to serve as administrator because of being younger than age specified, to nominate administrator, 64 ALR2d 1152.

Construction and effect of statutory provision that no person is competent to act as executor or administrator whom court finds incompetent by reason of want of integrity, 73 ALR2d 458.

Eligibility of foreign corporation to appointment as executor or administrator, 26 ALR3d 1019.

Adverse interest or position as disqualification for appointment of administrator, executor, or other personal representative, 11 ALR4th 638.

§ 2-4-204.
Married woman may be administratrix.

A married woman may be appointed and serve as administratrix the same in every respect as a femme sole. When an unmarried woman appointed administratrix marries her authority is not extinguished.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4638; C.S. 1910, § 5505; C.S. 1920, § 6778; Laws 1925, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-1704; C.S. 1945, § 6-904; W.S. 1957, § 2-96; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-204; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

§ 2-4-205.
Petition for letters of administration; contents; effect of want of jurisdictional averments.

A petition for letters of administration shall be in writing, signed by the applicant or his counsel and filed with the clerk of the court. The petition shall state the facts essential to give the court jurisdiction of the case, and when known to the applicant, shall state the names, ages and residences of the heirs of the decedent, the value and character of the property and where the same is situated. If the jurisdictional facts existed but are not fully set forth in the petition, and are afterwards proved in the course of administration, the decree or order of administration and subsequent proceedings are not void on account of such want of jurisdictional averments.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4646; C.S. 1910, § 5513; C.S. 1920, § 6786; R.S. 1931, § 88-1901; C.S. 1945, § 6-905; W.S. 1957, § 2-97; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-205; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

As to form of letters, see §

2-4-214

.

Cited

in

In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-4-206.
Contest of petition; assertion of own rights to administer.

Any person interested may contest the petition by filing written opposition on the ground of the incompetency of the applicant, or may assert his own rights to the administration and pray that letters be issued to himself. In the latter case the contestant shall file a petition and submit evidence in support thereof, taken and reduced to writing before the clerk or commissioner of the court, and the court shall hear the two (2) petitions together.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4649; C.S. 1910, § 5516; C.S. 1920, § 6789; R.S. 1931, § 88-1903; C.S. 1945, § 6-907; W.S. 1957, § 2-99; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-207; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

Interested person. —

Father was not an interested person within the meaning of the statute because his decedent son had a wife and three children. Peters v. Peters, 2001 WY 71, 29 P.3d 90,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2001).

Wrongful death action defendant, the decedent's employer, did not have standing to challenge the appointment of the decedent's estate's personal representative because a wrongful death action defendant did not have a personal stake or tangible interest in that appointment, and could not intervene in probate estate action as a matter of right for the purpose of challenging the appointment of the personal representative Halliburton Energy Servs. v. Gunter, 2007 WY 151, 167 P.3d 645,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2007).

Contestant's own qualifications to be shown. —

Person contesting appointment of another as administrator of an estate, who seeks appointment himself, must establish his own qualifications for the appointment. Replogle v. Coolidge, 47 Wyo. 488, 41 P.2d 503,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

§ 2-4-207.
Hearing of contest; issuance of letters.

After hearing the allegations and proofs of the parties, the court shall order the issuing of letters of administration to the party best entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4650; C.S. 1910, § 5517; C.S. 1920, § 6790; R.S. 1931, § 88-1904; C.S. 1945, § 6-908; W.S. 1957, § 2-100; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-208; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

Contestant's own qualifications to be shown. —

Person contesting appointment of another as administrator of an estate, who seeks appointment himself, must establish his own qualifications for the appointment. Replogle v. Coolidge, 47 Wyo. 488, 41 P.2d 503,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

§ 2-4-208.
When letters granted.

Letters of administration may be granted at any time appointed for the hearing of the application, or at any time to which the hearing is continued or postponed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4647; C.S. 1910, § 5514; C.S. 1920, § 6787; R.S. 1931, § 88-1902; C.S. 1945, § 6-906; W.S. 1957, § 2-98; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-206; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that appointment shall lapse upon failure to qualify, and as to additional appointment, see §

2-3-104

.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-4-209.
Letters granted to any applicant if not contested.

Letters of administration shall be granted to any applicant, though it appears there are other persons having better rights to the administration, when those persons fail to appear either in person or by agent or attorney and claim the issuing of letters themselves.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 4651; C.S. 1910, § 5518; C.S. 1920, § 6791; R.S. 1931, § 88-1905; C.S. 1945, § 6-909; W.S. 1957, § 2-101; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-209; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

§ 2-4-210.
Letters granted on request of person entitled.

Administration may be granted to one (1) or more competent persons, although not otherwise entitled to the same, at the written request of the person entitled, filed in court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4652; C.S. 1910, § 5519; C.S. 1920, § 6792; R.S. 1931, § 88-1906; C.S. 1945, § 6-910; W.S. 1957, § 2-102; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-210; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to persons entitled to administer, see §

2-4-201

.

Cited

in

In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

§ 2-4-211.
Creditors; right to apply for letters.

If letters testamentary or of administration have not been issued upon the request of any other person, any creditor of the decedent may apply for letters of administration at any time within two (2) years after the death of decedent, but not afterwards.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 32, § 1; 1945, ch. 69, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-915; W.S. 1957, § 2-103; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-211; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to time for filing or exhibiting claims and as to effect of failure to file, see §

2-7-703

.

Purpose of section

is to give creditors an opportunity to protect their rights, but only within a limited time. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Failure to timely file bars action. —

The failure to file claims against decedent's estate until almost four years after they arose caused this section to bar the action. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Even though claims filed on same day decedent's administratrix appointed. —

See Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Applied

in

State ex rel. State Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1961).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-4-212.
Creditors; when claims barred; effect on liens.

If the letters are not issued within the time specified, all claims of creditors are forever barred and the purchasers of the property of the decedent from the heirs of the decedent shall take the title free from any claim of creditors. This act does not affect the lien upon encumbered property secured by valid mortgage or deed of trust in the case of real property, or by security agreement or interest valid under the Wyoming Uniform Commercial Code, but the secured creditor is not entitled to any deficiency judgment.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 32, § 2; 1945, ch. 69, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 6-916; W.S. 1957, § 2-104; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-212; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to property, conveyances and security transactions, see title 34.

For provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, see title 34.1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” seems to refer to provisions originally enacted by ch. 32, Laws 1933, which presently appear as §§

2-4-211

and

2-4-212

.

Section not deemed nonclaim statute. —

A nonclaim statute is one which bars a creditor's claim for failure to file within a time fixed by notice given in a probate proceeding, which is not the effect of this section. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

It is curative act validating conveyances by heirs. —

This section is a curative act in that it purports to give legal effect to conveyances from heirs to purchasers of estate properties in cases where letters have not been issued within two years from date of decedent's death. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

And also is special statute of limitation. —

See Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

As a curative act, the words “shall (now “are”) be forever barred” may be unnecessary and surplusage; but as an act of limitation, they are essential, and their use indicates a positive legislative intent to bar creditors' claims after the lapse of two years following a debtor's death in cases where there has been no probate. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Failure to timely file bars action. —

The failure to file claims against decedent's estate until almost four years after they arose caused an action to be barred. Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Even though claims filed on same day decedent's administratrix appointed. —

See Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Applied

in

State ex rel. State Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1961).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-4-213.
Transcript of court minutes to be evidence of appointment.

A transcript from the minutes of the court showing the appointment of any person as administrator, together with the certificate of the clerk under his hand and the seal of the court, that the person has given bond and been qualified and that letters of administration have been issued to him and have not been revoked, shall have the same effect in evidence as the letters themselves.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4620; C.S. 1910, § 5480; C.S. 1920, § 6753; R.S. 1931, § 88-1105; C.S. 1945, § 6-1207; W.S. 1957, § 2-105; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-213; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-4-214.
Form of letters of administration.

Letters of administration shall be signed by the clerk under the seal of the court, and substantially in the following form:

State of Wyoming County of ss C. D. is hereby appointed administrator of the estate of A. B., deceased. Witness, G. H., clerk of the district court within and for the county of with the seal thereto affixed, the day of A. D. Clerk.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 6, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4659; C.S. 1910, § 5526; C.S. 1920, § 6799; R.S. 1931, § 88-2103; C.S. 1945, § 6-803; W.S. 1957, § 2-92; W.S. 1977, §

2-5-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).